Utah statutes.
75-7-703.   Cotrustees.
(1)  Cotrustees who are unable to reach a unanimous decision may act by
majority decision.
(2)  If a vacancy occurs in a cotrusteeship, the remaining cotrustees may act
for the trust.
(3)  A cotrustee must participate in the performance of a trustee's function
unless the cotrustee is unavailable to perform the function because of
absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary
incapacity, or the cotrustee has properly delegated the performance of the
function to another trustee.
(4)  If a cotrustee is unavailable to perform duties because of absence,
illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary incapacity, or
if a cotrustee fails or refuses to act after reasonable notice, and prompt
action is necessary to achieve the purposes of the trust or to avoid injury to
the trust property, the remaining cotrustee or a majority of the remaining
cotrustees may act for the trust.
(5)  A trustee may not delegate to a cotrustee the performance of a function
the settlor intended the trustees to perform jointly as determined from the
terms of the trust.  If one of the cotrustees is a regulated financial service
institution qualified to do trust business in this state and the remaining
cotrustees are individuals, a delegation by the individual cotrustees to the
regulated financial service institution of the performance of trust investment
functions shall be presumed to be in accordance with the settlor's intent
unless the terms of the trust specifically provide otherwise.  Unless a
delegation was irrevocable, a trustee may revoke a delegation previously made.
(6)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (7), a trustee who does not
join in an action of another trustee is not liable for the action.
(7)  Each trustee shall exercise reasonable care to:
(a)  prevent a cotrustee from committing a serious breach of trust; and
(b)  compel a cotrustee to redress a serious breach of trust.
(8)  A dissenting trustee who joins in an action at the direction of the
majority of the trustees and who notified any cotrustee of the dissent at or
before the time of the action is not liable for the action unless the action
is a serious breach of trust.
